Nebraska, session 109, LB403.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB403 LB403
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) There is hereby created an Office of Grants in the
executive branch of state government. The office shall consist of the
Director of Grants, who shall be appointed by the Governor and serve at
his or her pleasure, and such other employees as are appointed by the
Director of Grants to achieve the purposes of this section and for which
adequate funding is available. The person appointed to serve as Director
of Grants shall have at least ten years of experience in writing or
managing federal grants and shall be selected after conducting a
nationwide search.
(2) The Office of Grants shall:
(a) Identify national grant programs, including grant programs of
the federal government, that are available to state agencies, political
subdivisions of this state, and private organizations located in this
state; and
(b) Assist state agencies, political subdivisions of this state, and
private organizations located in this state in identifying relevant
national grant programs, applying for grant funding under such programs,
and complying with such programs.
(3) No later than July 1, 2026, the Office of Grants shall create a
statewide plan for maximizing the amount of grant funding received by
state agencies, political subdivisions of this state, and private
organizations located in this state under national grant programs,
including grant programs of the federal government. The office shall
update such statewide plan annually.
(4) No later than July 1, 2026, and no later than July 1 of each
year thereafter, the Office of Grants shall electronically submit a
report to the Legislature which includes:
(a) A summary of the statewide plan described in subsection (3) of
this section;
(b) An analysis of whether any state legislation passed during the
most recently completed legislative session supports, hinders, or
-2-

LB403 LB403
2025 2025
otherwise affects the ability to receive funding under national grant
programs, including grant programs of the federal government;
(c) The number of state agencies, political subdivisions, and
private organizations served by the office during the most recent
calendar year; and
(d) The number of national grant awards received during the most
recent calendar year by state agencies, political subdivisions, and
private organizations as a result of services provided by the office and
the total dollar amount of such grant awards.
-3-